Alaska statutes. Title 46. Water, Air, Energy, and Environmental Conservation.
Article 3. Water Resources Board.

Collateral references. —

78 Am. Jur. 2d, Waters, §§ 138-143.

Sec. 46.15.190.
The Water Resources Board.

There is created the Water Resources Board composed of seven members having a general knowledge of the use and requirements for use of the water of the state and the conservation and protection of it. The commissioner of environmental conservation or a designee shall serve as an additional, ex officio member serving without a vote.
The commissioner of natural resources shall act as the executive secretary of the board, and shall provide clerical staff for the board. Members of the board are appointed by the governor, subject to confirmation by a majority of the members of the legislature in joint session.

History.

(§ 1 ch 50 SLA 1966; am § 1 ch 58 SLA 1972)

Sec. 46.15.200.
Term of office.

The term of office for members of the board is four years. If a vacancy occurs, the governor shall fill it by appointment for the unexpired term, subject to AS

39.05.080

(4). The appointment shall be submitted to the legislature for confirmation at the next regular session.

History.

(§ 1 ch 50 SLA 1966; am § 82 ch 14 SLA 1987; am § 19 ch 80 SLA 1996)

Sec. 46.15.210.
Duties of the board.

The board shall inform and advise the governor on all matters relating to the use and appropriation of water in the state, including, but not limited to,

the effect and adequacy of state laws and regulations governing the establishment of water rights;

the multi-purpose uses of water;

the prevention of pollution and the protection of fish and game;

studies of the state’s water supplies and plans for future requirements;

development of water resources;

participation of local governmental units in the management of water resources;

land that is or may be needed for dams, reservoirs, flood dams, flood ways, canals, or ditches for the impoundment, storage, flow, and control of water.

History.

(§ 1 ch 50 SLA 1966)

Revisor’s notes. —

Organized into paragraphs in 1987.

Sec. 46.15.220.
Board meetings.

The board shall hold one regular meeting annually at the state capital and one or more additional meetings at the time and place in the state the board selects for the transaction of business.

History.

(§ 1 ch 50 SLA 1966)

Sec. 46.15.230.
Public meetings.

The board may hold and conduct public meetings at any time or any place in the state in order to obtain public opinion on a water use problem or proposal and it may, by majority vote of all members, formally or informally delivered, authorize one or more of its members to hold and conduct a public meeting.

History.

(§ 1 ch 50 SLA 1966)

Sec. 46.15.240.
Compensation of board members.

Each member of the board is entitled to travel expenses and per diem as authorized for state boards by AS

39.20.180

while traveling to or from, or in attendance at, regular or special meetings or conferences authorized by the board.

History.

(§ 1 ch 50 SLA 1966)